Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 237A.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. All personnel in licensed or registered child care facilities shall have good health as evidenced by a report following a preemployment physical examination taken . b. An individual shall have received an initial physical examination within the six months prior to beginning immediately preceding the date the individual begins employment , or within the six months immediately following the date the individual begins employment . The c. A physical examination shall include communicable disease tests performed by a licensed physician as defined in section 135C.1 , or by a licensed physician assistant as defined in section 148C.1 and . d. Licensed or registered facility personnel shall be repeated receive a physical examination under this subsection at least once every three years after the date of the individualâs initial employment physical examination under paragraph âbâ . House File 390, p. 2 e. Controlled medical conditions which would not affect the performance of the employee in the capacity employed shall not prohibit employment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 390, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor